Washington statutes.
RCW 5.40.030

Proof of missing in action, capture by enemy, etc.

An official written report or record, or duly certified copy thereof, that a person is missing, missing in action, interned in a neutral country, or beleaguered, besieged or captured by an enemy, or is dead, or is alive, made by any officer or employee of the United States authorized by the act referred to in RCW 5.40.020 or by any other law of the United States to make same, shall be received in any court, office or other place in this state as prima facie evidence that such person is missing, missing in action, interned in a neutral country, or beleaguered, besieged or captured by an enemy, or is dead, or is alive, as the case may be.

[ 1945 c 101 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 1257-2.]